en-dict/en.affix
SFX d Y 16
SFX d 0 d e 
SFX d 0 ked [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX d 0 led [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX d y ied [^aeiou]y 
SFX d 0 ed [aeiou]y 
SFX d 0 ed [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX d 0 ed [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX d 0 ed [^ecly] 
SFX d e ing [^eioy]e 
SFX d 0 ing [eoy]e 
SFX d ie ying ie 
SFX d 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX d 0 ling [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX d 0 ing [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX d 0 ing [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX d 0 ing [^ecl] 
SFX h Y 22
SFX h 0 dly e 
SFX h 0 bedly [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX h 0 kedly [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX h 0 dedly [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX h 0 fedly [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX h 0 gedly [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX h 0 kedly [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX h 0 ledly [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX h 0 medly [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX h 0 nedly [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX h 0 pedly [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX h 0 redly [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX h 0 sedly [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX h 0 tedly [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX h 0 vedly [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX h 0 zedly [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX h 0 edly [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX h y iedly [^aeiou]y 
SFX h 0 edly [aeiou]y 
SFX h 0 edly [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX h 0 edly [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX h 0 edly [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX i Y 22
SFX i 0 dness e 
SFX i 0 bedness [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX i 0 kedness [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX i 0 dedness [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX i 0 fedness [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX i 0 gedness [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX i 0 kedness [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX i 0 ledness [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX i 0 medness [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX i 0 nedness [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX i 0 pedness [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX i 0 redness [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX i 0 sedness [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX i 0 tedness [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX i 0 vedness [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX i 0 zedness [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX i 0 edness [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX i y iedness [^aeiou]y 
SFX i 0 edness [aeiou]y 
SFX i 0 edness [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX i 0 edness [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX i 0 edness [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX T Y 42
SFX T 0 r e 
SFX T 0 st e
SFX T 0 ber [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX T 0 best [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX T 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX T 0 kest [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX T 0 der [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX T 0 dest [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX T 0 fer [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX T 0 fest [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX T 0 ger [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX T 0 gest [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX T 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX T 0 kest [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX T 0 ler [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX T 0 lest [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX T 0 mer [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX T 0 mest [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX T 0 ner [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX T 0 nest [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX T 0 per [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX T 0 pest [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX T 0 rer [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX T 0 rest [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX T 0 ser [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX T 0 sest [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX T 0 ter [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX T 0 test [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX T 0 ver [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX T 0 vest [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX T 0 zer [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX T 0 zest [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX T y ier [^aeiou]y 
SFX T y iest [^aeiou]y
SFX T 0 er [aeiou]y 
SFX T 0 est [aeiou]y
SFX T 0 er [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 er [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 er [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX T 0 est [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 est [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 est [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX R Y 72
SFX R 0 r e 
SFX R 0 rs e 
SFX R 0 ber [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX R 0 bers [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX R 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX R 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX R 0 der [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX R 0 ders [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX R 0 fer [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX R 0 fers [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX R 0 ger [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX R 0 gers [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX R 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX R 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX R 0 ler [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 er [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 ler [^aeo]al 
SFX R 0 er [aeo]al 
SFX R 0 lers [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 ers [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 lers [^aeo]al 
SFX R 0 ers [aeo]al 
SFX R 0 mer [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX R 0 mers [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX R 0 ner [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX R 0 ners [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX R 0 per [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX R 0 pers [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX R 0 rer [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX R 0 rers [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX R 0 ser [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX R 0 sers [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX R 0 ter [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX R 0 ters [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX R 0 ver [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX R 0 vers [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX R 0 zer [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX R 0 zers [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX R y ier [^aeiou]y 
SFX R y iers [^aeiou]y 
SFX R 0 er [aeiou]y 
SFX R 0 ers [aeiou]y 
SFX R 0 er [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 ers [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 er [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 ers [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 er [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX R 0 ers [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX R 0 r's e 
SFX R 0 ber's [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX R 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX R 0 der's [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX R 0 fer's [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX R 0 ger's [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX R 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX R 0 ler's [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 er's [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 ler's [^aeo]al 
SFX R 0 er's [aeo]al 
SFX R 0 mer's [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX R 0 ner's [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX R 0 per's [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX R 0 rer's [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX R 0 ser's [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX R 0 ter's [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX R 0 ver's [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX R 0 zer's [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX R y ier's [^aeiou]y 
SFX R 0 er's [aeiou]y 
SFX R 0 er's [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 er's [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 er's [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX r Y 24
SFX r 0 r e 
SFX r 0 ler [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX r 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX r y ier [^aeiou]y 
SFX r 0 er [aeiou]y 
SFX r 0 er [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 er [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 er [^ecly] 
SFX r 0 rs e 
SFX r 0 lers [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX r 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX r y iers [^aeiou]y 
SFX r 0 ers [aeiou]y 
SFX r 0 ers [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 ers [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 ers [^ecly] 
SFX r 0 r's e 
SFX r 0 ler's [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX r 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX r y ier's [^aeiou]y 
SFX r 0 er's [aeiou]y 
SFX r 0 er's [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 er's [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 er's [^ecly] 
SFX S Y 9
SFX S y ies [^aeiou]y 
SFX S 0 s [aeiou]y 
SFX S 0 es [sxz] 
SFX S 0 es [cs]h 
SFX S 0 s [^cs]h 
SFX S 0 s [ae]u 
SFX S 0 x [ae]u 
SFX S 0 s [^ae]u 
SFX S 0 s [^hsuxyz]
SFX P Y 6
SFX P y iness [^aeiou]y 
SFX P 0 ness [aeiou]y 
SFX P 0 ness [^y] 
SFX P y iness's [^aeiou]y 
SFX P 0 ness's [aeiou]y 
SFX P 0 ness's [^y] 
SFX m Y 20
SFX m 0 sman [bdknmt] 
SFX m 0 sman [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 man [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 man [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 man [^bdeknmt] 
SFX m 0 smen [bdknmt] 
SFX m 0 smen [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 men [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 men [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 men [^bdeknmt] 
SFX m 0 sman's [bdknmt] 
SFX m 0 sman's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 man's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 man's [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 man's [^bdeknmt] 
SFX m 0 smen's [bdknmt] 
SFX m 0 smen's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 men's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 men's [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 men's [^bdeknmt] 
SFX 5 Y 15
SFX 5 0 swoman [bdknmt] 
SFX 5 0 swoman [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 woman [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 woman [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 woman [^bdeknmt] 
SFX 5 0 swomen [bdknmt] 
SFX 5 0 swomen [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 women [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 women [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 women [^bdeknmt] 
SFX 5 0 swoman's [bdknmt] 
SFX 5 0 swoman's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 woman's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 woman's [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 woman's [^bdeknmt] 
SFX 6 Y 3
SFX 6 y iful [^aeiou]y 
SFX 6 0 ful [aeiou]y 
SFX 6 0 ful [^y] 
SFX j Y 3
SFX j y ifully [^aeiou]y 
SFX j 0 fully [aeiou]y 
SFX j 0 fully [^y] 
SFX p Y 5
SFX p y iless [^aeiou]y 
SFX p 0 less [aeiou]y 
SFX p 0 ess ll 
SFX p 0 less [^l]l 
SFX p 0 less [^ly] 
